Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB296.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS CHAPTER 426A IS ESTABLISHED AND A NEW
SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Registration of Canadian
Money Judgments Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act:
(1) "Canada" means the sovereign nation of Canada and its provinces and
territories. "Canadian" has a corresponding meaning; and
(2) "Canadian judgment" means a judgment of a court of Canada, other than a
judgment that recognized the judgment of another foreign country.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall apply to a Canadian judgment to the extent the
judgment is within the scope of Section 14 of this Act, if recognition of the
judgment is sought to enforce the judgment.
(2) A Canadian judgment that grants both recovery of a sum of money and other
relief may be registered under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act, but only to the extent
of the grant of recovery of a sum of money.
(3) A Canadian judgment regarding subject matter both within and not within the
scope of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act may be registered under Sections 1 to 11 of
this Act, but only to the extent the judgment is with regard to subject matter
within the scope of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
(1) A person seeking recognition of a Canadian judgment described in Section 3 of
this Act to enforce the judgment may file the judgment in the office of clerk of the
court in which an action for recognition of the judgment could be filed under
Section 17 of this Act.
(2) A registration under subsection (1) of this section shall be executed by the person
registering the judgment or the person's attorney and include:
(a) A copy of the Canadian judgment authenticated under Section 17 of this
Act as an accurate copy by the court that entered the judgment;
(b) The name and address of the person registering the judgment;
(c) If the person registering the judgment is not the person in whose favor the
judgment was rendered, a statement describing the interest the person
registering the judgment has in the judgment which entitles the person to
seek its recognition and enforcement;
(d) The name and last known address of the person against whom the judgment
is being registered;
(e) If the judgment is of the type described in subsection (2) or (3) of Section 3
of this Act, a description of the part of the judgment being registered;
(f) The amount of the judgment or part of the judgment being registered
identifying:
1. The amount of interest accrued as of the date of registration on the
judgment or part of the judgment being registered, the rate of interest,
the part of the judgment to which interest applies, and the date when
the interest began to accrue;
2. Costs and expenses included in the judgment or part of the judgment
being registered, other than an amount awarded for attorney's fees;
and
3. The amount of any award of attorney's fees included in the judgment
Page 2 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
or part of the judgment being registered;
(g) The amount, as of the date of registration, of post-judgment costs, expenses,
and attorney's fees claimed by the person registering the judgment or part
of the judgment;
(h) The amount of the judgment or part of the judgment being registered which
has been satisfied as of the date of registration;
(i) A statement that:
1. The judgment is final, conclusive, and enforceable under the law of
the Canadian jurisdiction in which it was rendered;
2. The judgment or part of the judgment being registered is within the
scope of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act; and
3. If a part of the judgment is being registered, the amounts stated in the
registration under paragraphs (f), (g), and (h) of this subsection relate
to the part being registered;
(j) If the judgment is not in English, a certified translation of the judgment
into English; and
(k) A registration fee set by rule of the Kentucky Supreme Court in accordance
with KRS 23A.200 and 24A.170.
(3) On receipt of a registration that includes the documents, information, and
registration fee required in subsection (2) of this section, the clerk of the court
shall file the registration and, except as may be otherwise provided in Sections 1
to 11 of this Act, shall treat the judgment in the same manner as a judgment of
any court or this state as provided in KRS 426.955.
(4) A registration substantially in the following form complies with the registration
requirements in subsection (2) of this section if the registration includes the
attachments specified in the form:
"REGISTRATION OF CANADIAN MONEY JUDGMENT
Page 3 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
Complete and file this form, together with the documents required by Part V of this
form, with the clerk of the court. When stating an amount of money, identify the
currency in which the amount is stated.
PART I. IDENTIFICATION OF CANADIAN JUDGMENT
Canadian Court Rendering the Judgment: ___________________________
Case/Docket Number in Canadian Court: ____________________________
Name of Plaintiff(s): _____________________________________________
Name of Defendant(s):____________________________________________
The Canadian Court entered the judgment on _________(Date) in ___________(City)
in ____________________(Province or Territory).
The judgment includes an award for the payment of money in favor of _________in
the amount of ____________________________.
If only part of the Canadian judgment is subject to registration pursuant to subsections
(2) and (3) of Section 3 of this Act, describe the part of the judgment being registered:
_____________________________________________________.
PART II. IDENTIFICATION OF PERSON REGISTERING JUDGMENT AND
PERSON AGAINST WHOM JUDGMENT IS BEING REGISTERED
Provide the following information for all persons seeking to register the judgment
under this registration and all persons against whom the judgment is being registered
under this registration.
Name of person(s) registering judgment:__________________________.
If the person registering the judgment is not the person in whose favor the judgment
was rendered, describe the interest the person registering the judgment has in the
judgment which entitles the person to seek its recognition and
enforcement:______________________________________________________
Address:__________________________________________________________
Additional Contact Information for Person(s) Registering Judgment (Optional):______
Page 4 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
Telephone Number: __________________FAX Number:_______________
Email Address: ________________________
Name of Attorney for Person(s) Registering Judgment, if any: ____________________
Address: ______________________________
Telephone Number: ________________FAX Number:_________________
Email Address: _________________________
Name of Person(s) Against Whom Judgment is Being Registered:_________________
Address of Person(s) Against Whom Judgment is Being Registered (provide the most
recent address known):________________________________.
Additional contact information for Person(s) Against Whom Judgment is Being
Registered (Optional) (provide most recent information known):
Telephone Number: _________________FAX Number:_________________
Email Address: ________________________
PART III. CALCULATION OF AMOUNT FOR WHICH ENFORCEMENT IS
SOUGHT
Identify the currency or currencies in which each amount is stated.
The amount of the Canadian judgment or part of the judgment being registered is
_______________________.
The amount of interest accrued as of the date of registration on the part of the
judgment being registered is _______________________________.
The applicable rate of interest is __________________. The date when interest began
to accrue is ________________. The part of the judgment to which the interest applies
is ___________________________.
The Canadian court awarded costs and expenses relating to the part of the judgment
being registered in the amount of _________(Exclude any amount included in the
award of costs and expenses that represents an award of attorney's fees).
The Canadian court awarded attorney's fees relating to the part of the judgment being
Page 5 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
registered in the amount of ___________________.
The person registering the Canadian judgment claims post-judgment costs and
expenses of _______________ and post-judgment attorney's fees of _______________
relating to the part of the judgment being registered (include only costs, expenses, and
attorney's fees incurred before registration).
The amount of the part of the judgment being registered that has been satisfied as of
the date of registration is __________________.
The total amount for which enforcement of the part of the judgment being registered is
sought is _______________________________.
PART IV. STATEMENT OF PERSON REGISTERING JUDGMENT
I, ___________________(Person registering judgment or attorney for person
registering judgment), state:
1. The Canadian judgment is final, conclusive, and enforceable under the law
of the Canadian jurisdiction in which it was rendered.
2. The Canadian judgment or part of the Canadian judgment being registered
is within the scope of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
3. If only a part of the Canadian judgment is being registered, the amounts
stated in Part III of this form that relate to that part.
PART V. ITEMS REQUIRED TO BE INCLUDED WITH REGISTRATION
Attached are (check to signify required items are included):
______A copy of the Canadian judgment authenticated as accurate by the Canadian
court that entered the judgment in the same manner a copy of a foreign judgment is
authenticated in an action under Section 17 of this Act.
______If the Canadian judgment is not in English, a certified translation of the
judgment into English.
_______A registration fee in the amount established by the Supreme Court of
Kentucky.
Page 6 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
I declare that the information provided on this form is true and correct to the best
of my knowledge and belief.
Submitted by:________________________________
Person Registering Judgment or Attorney for Person
Registering Judgment (Specify Whether Signer is the
Person Registering the Judgment or that Person's
Attorney)
Date of Submission: __________________________"
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a Canadian judgment registered under
Section 4 of this Act has the same effect provided in Section 18 of this Act for a
judgment a court determines to be entitled to recognition.
(2) A Canadian judgment registered under Section 4 of this Act shall not be enforced
by sale or other disposition of property, or by seizure of property, until thirty-one
(31) days after notice of registration under Section 6 of this Act is served. The
court for cause may provide for a shorter or longer time. This subsection shall
not preclude use of relief available under the laws of this state other than
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act to prevent dissipation, disposition, or removal of
property.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person who registers a Canadian judgment under Section 4 of this Act shall
cause notice of registration to be served on the person against whom the
judgment has been registered.
(2) Notice under this section shall be served in the same manner as a summons and
complaint is required to be served in an action seeking recognition under Section
Page 7 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
17 of this Act of a foreign-country money judgment.
(3) Notice under this section shall include:
(a) The date of registration and the court in which the judgment was registered;
(b) The case number assigned to the registration;
(c) The name and address of:
1. The person registering the judgment; and
2. The person's attorney, if any;
(d) A copy of the registration, including the documents required under
subsection (2) of Section 4 of this Act; and
(e) A statement that:
1. The person against whom the judgment has been registered, not later
than thirty (30) days after the date of service of notice, may petition
the court to vacate the registration; and
2. The court may, for good cause shown, provide for a shorter or longer
time.
(4) Proof of service of the notice under this section shall be filed with the court.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) No later than thirty (30) days after service of the notice required under Section 6
of this Act, the person against whom the judgment was registered may petition the
court to vacate the registration. The court, for good cause shown, may provide for
a shorter or longer time for filing the petition.
(2) A petition filed under this section may only assert:
(a) A ground that could be asserted to deny recognition of the judgment under
Sections 12 to 23 of this Act; or
(b) A failure to comply with a requirement of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act for
registration of the judgment.
Page 8 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
(3) A petition filed under this section shall not in and of itself stay enforcement of the
registered judgment.
(4) If the court grants a petition under this section, the registration shall be vacated,
and any act under the registration to enforce the registered judgment is void.
(5) If the court grants a petition under this section on a ground under subsection
(2)(a) of this section, the court shall also enter a judgment denying recognition of
the Canadian judgment. A judgment entered under this subsection shall have the
same effect as a judgment denying recognition of a judgment on the same ground
under Sections 12 to 23 of this Act.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A person who filed a petition under subsection (1) of Section 7 of this Act to vacate
registration of a Canadian judgment may request the court to stay enforcement of the
judgment pending a determination of the petition. The court shall grant the stay if the
person establishes a likelihood of success on the merits with regard to a ground listed
in subsection (2) of Section 7 of this Act for vacating a registration. The court may
require the person to provide security in an amount determined by the court as a
condition of granting the stay.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Sections 1 to 11 of this Act supplement Sections 12 to 23 of this Act and all
provisions except Section 17 of this Act apply to a registration under Sections 1 to
11 of this Act.
(2) A person may seek recognition of a Canadian judgment described in Section 3 of
this Act either:
(a) By registration under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act; or
(b) Under Section 17 of this Act.
Page 9 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
(3) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, a person may not seek recognition in this
state of the same judgment or part of a judgment described in subsection (2) or
(3) of Section 3 of this Act with regard to the same person under both Sections 1
to 11 of this Act and Section 17 of this Act.
(4) If the court grants a petition to vacate a registration solely on a ground under
subsection (2)(b) of Section 7 of this Act, the person seeking registration may:
(a) If the defect in the registration can be cured, file a new registration under
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act; or
(b) Seek recognition of the judgment under Section 17 of this Act.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 1 to 11 of this Act, consideration shall be given to
the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among
states that enact it.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall apply to the registration of a Canadian judgment
entered in a proceeding that is commenced in Canada on or after the effective date of
this Act.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 12 to 23 of this Act may be cited as the Uniform Foreign Country Money
Judgments Recognition Act.
SECTION 13. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 12 to 23 of this Act:
(1) "Foreign country" means a government other than:
Page 10 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
(a) The United States;
(b) A state, district, commonwealth, territory, or insular possession of the
United States; or
(c) Any other government to which the decision in this state as to whether to
recognize a judgment of that government's courts is initially subject to
determination under the Full Faith and Credit Clause of the United States
Constitution; and
(2) "Foreign-country judgment" means a judgment of a court of a foreign country.
SECTION 14. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, Sections 12 to 23 of this Act
applies to a foreign-country judgment to the extent that the judgment:
(a) Grants or denies recovery of a sum of money; and
(b) Under the law of the foreign country where rendered, is final, conclusive,
and enforceable.
(2) Sections 12 to 23 of this Act do not apply to a foreign-country judgment, even if
the judgment grants or denies recovery of a sum of money, to the extent that the
judgment is:
(a) A judgment for taxes;
(b) A fine or other penalty; or
(c) A judgment for divorce, support, or maintenance, or other judgment
rendered in connection with domestic relations.
(3) A party seeking recognition of a foreign-country judgment has the burden of
establishing that Sections 12 to 23 of this Act apply to the foreign-country
judgment.
SECTION 15. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 11 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a court of
this state shall recognize a foreign-country judgment to which Sections 12 to 23
of this Act apply.
(2) A court of this state may not recognize a foreign-country judgment if:
(a) The judgment was rendered under a judicial system that does not provide
impartial tribunals or procedures compatible with the requirements of due
process of law;
(b) The foreign court did not have personal jurisdiction over the defendant; or
(c) The foreign court did not have jurisdiction over the subject matter.
(3) A court of this state shall not be required to recognize a foreign-country judgment
if:
(a) The defendant in the proceeding in the foreign court did not receive notice
of the proceeding in sufficient time to enable the defendant to defend;
(b) The judgment was obtained by fraud that deprived the losing party of an
adequate opportunity to present its case;
(c) The judgment or the cause of action on which the judgment is based is
repugnant to the public policy of this state or of the United States;
(d) The judgment conflicts with another final and conclusive judgment;
(e) The proceeding in the foreign court was contrary to an agreement between
the parties under which the dispute in question was to be determined other
than by proceedings in that foreign country;
(f) In the case of jurisdiction based only on personal service, the foreign court
was a seriously inconvenient forum for the trial of the action;
(g) The judgment was rendered in circumstances that raise substantial doubt
about the integrity of the rendering court with respect to the judgment; or
(h) The specific proceeding in the foreign court leading to the judgment was
not compatible with the requirements of due process of law.
Page 12 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
(4) A party resisting recognition of a foreign-country judgment has the burden of
establishing that a ground for nonrecognition stated in subsection (2) or (3) of
this section exists.
SECTION 16. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A foreign-country judgment shall not be refused recognition for lack of personal
jurisdiction if the defendant:
(a) Was served with process personally in the foreign country;
(b) Voluntarily appeared in the proceeding, other than for the purpose of
protecting property seized or threatened with seizure in the proceeding or of
contesting the jurisdiction of the court over the defendant;
(c) Before the commencement of the proceeding, had agreed to submit to the
jurisdiction of the foreign court with respect to the subject matter involved;
(d) Was domiciled in the foreign country when the proceeding was instituted or
was a corporation or other form of business organization that had its
principal place of business in, or was organized under the laws of, the
foreign country;
(e) Had a business office in the foreign country and the proceeding in the
foreign court involved a cause of action arising out of business done by the
defendant through that office in the foreign country; or
(f) Operated a motor vehicle or airplane in the foreign country and the
proceeding involved a cause of action arising out of that operation.
(2) The list of bases for personal jurisdiction in subsection (1) of this section shall
not be exclusive. The courts of this state may recognize bases of personal
jurisdiction other than those listed in subsection (1) of this section as sufficient to
support a foreign-country judgment.
SECTION 17. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
Page 13 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If recognition of a foreign-country judgment is sought as an original matter, the
issue of recognition shall be raised by filing an action seeking recognition of the
foreign-country judgment.
(2) If recognition of a foreign-country judgment is sought in a pending action, the
issue of recognition may be raised by counterclaim, cross-claim, or affirmative
defense.
SECTION 18. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
If the court in a proceeding under Section 17 of this Act finds that the foreign-country
judgment is entitled to recognition under Sections 12 to 23 of this Act then, to the
extent that the foreign-country judgment grants of denied recovery of a sum of money,
the foreign-country judgment shall be:
(1) Conclusive between the parties to the same extent as the judgment of a sister state
entitled to full faith and credit in this state would be conclusive; and
(2) Enforceable in the same manner and to the same extent as a judgment rendered
in this state.
SECTION 19. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
If a party establishes that an appeal from a foreign-country judgment is pending or will
be taken, the court may stay any proceedings with regard to the foreign-country
judgment until the:
(1) Appeal is concluded;
(2) Time for appeal expires; or
(3) Appellant has had sufficient time to prosecute the appeal and has failed to do so.
SECTION 20. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 14 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1674
An action to recognize a foreign-country judgment shall be commenced within the
earlier of the time during which the foreign-country judgment is effective in the
foreign country or fifteen (15) years from the date that the foreign-country judgment
became effective in the foreign country.
SECTION 21. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
In applying and construing Sections 12 to 23 of this Act, consideration shall be given
to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among
the states that enact it.
SECTION 22. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 12 to 23 of this Act shall not prevent the recognition under principles of
comity or otherwise of a foreign-country judgment not within the scope of Sections 12
to 23 of this Act.
SECTION 23. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 12 to 23 of this Act shall apply to all actions commenced after the effective
date of this Act in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is
raised.
Section 24. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 15 of 15
BR167400.100 - 1674 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:20 AM Jacketed